Utah statutes.
9-7-501.   Tax for establishment and maintenance of public library --
Library fund.
(1)  A county legislative body may establish and maintain a public library.
(2)  For this purpose, counties may levy annually a tax not to exceed .001 of
taxable value of taxable property in the county, outside of cities which
maintain their own city libraries as authorized by Part 4. The tax is in
addition to all taxes levied by counties and is not limited by the levy
limitation imposed on counties by law. However, if bonds are issued for
purchasing a site, or constructing or furnishing a building, then taxes
sufficient for the payment of the bonds and any interest may be levied.
(3)  The taxes shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other
general taxes of the county and shall constitute a fund to be known as the
county library fund.
